Washington statutes.
RCW 1.70.060

Preservation and security of legal material in official electronic record.

(1) An official publisher of legal material in an electronic record that is or was designated as official under RCW 1.70.030 shall provide for the preservation and security of the record in an electronic form or a form that is not electronic.

(2) If legal material is preserved under subsection (1) of this section in an electronic record, the official publisher shall:

(a) Ensure the integrity of the record;

(b) Provide for backup and disaster recovery of the record; and

(c) Ensure the continuing usability of the material.

[ 2017 c 106 s 7.]